Missouri, session 2026, HB2105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 386 and 441, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 386.021 and 441.239, to read as follows:
386.021. An owner or operator of a premises or the owner's or operator's third-
party water and sewer usage billing provider who furnishes water and sewer services to
lessees and charges lessees separately for their use of water and sewer services in
accordance with section 441.239 shall not be considered a "public utility", "sewer
corporation", or "water corporation" under this chapter or chapter 393, nor shall the
lessees of such owner or operator of a premises be considered a customer of any "public
utility", "sewer corporation", or "water corporation" under this chapter or chapters
386 and 393.
441.239. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an owner or operator of
a premises that is supplied water and sewer services by a "public utility" as defined in
section 386.020 or other state-certified corporation who furnishes water and sewer
services only to lessees on the premises and not to the public may:
(1) Utilize a separate meter to measure water and sewer usage within lessees'
dwelling units and charge lessees separately for water and sewer usage in accordance
with the measurement calculated through use of this separate meter; or
(2) Employ a program that utilizes a mathematical formula for the purpose of
calculating and allocating among all lessees those aggregate water and sewer usage
charges for which the owner or operator receives a bill.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2105 2
2. An owner or operator of premises upon which common areas are available for
use by all lessees may, in accordance with this section, utilize a mathematical formula
for the purpose of calculating and allocating among all lessees those aggregate, common-
area water and sewer usage charges for which the owner or operator receives a bill.
3. An owner or operator of premises who seeks to charge lessees separately for
water and sewer usage in accordance with subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section
shall disclose on each lessee's water and sewer usage bill the lessee's individual water
and sewer usage charges during the current billing period, meter readings taken at the
beginning and end of the current billing period, and the dates those meter readings were
taken.
4. An owner or operator of premises who seeks to allocate water and sewer usage
charges among lessees in accordance with subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section
and subsection 2 of this section shall first provide to potential lessees a clear and written
description of the mathematical formula used to calculate and allocate water and sewer
usage charges prior to the commencement of a lease.
5. The total amount of water and sewer usage charges billed to lessees in
accordance with subsections 1 and 2 of this section shall not exceed the amount charged
to the owner or operator by the public utility or state-certified corporation, including
applicable taxes and surcharges.
6. An owner or operator may charge and collect from lessees reasonable fees for
costs incurred by the owner or operator related to the provision of administrative
services undertaken to implement water and sewer usage billing in accordance with
subsections 1 and 2 of this section, provided that such charges are first disclosed to
lessees prior to the commencement of a lease.
7. An owner or operator may charge and collect from lessees a fee for late
payment of charges billed to lessees in accordance with subsections 1 and 2 of this
section. The late charge shall be deemed as rent.
8. An owner or operator of premises may hire a third-party provider to carry
out water and sewer usage billing services in accordance with subsections 1 and 2 of this
section. In carrying out water and sewer usage billing services on behalf of an owner or
operator of a premises, a third-party water and sewer usage billing provider shall
comply with subsections 3, 4, and 5 of this section.
9. An owner's or operator's third-party water and sewer usage billing provider
may charge and collect from lessees reasonable fees for costs incurred related to the
provision of administrative services undertaken to implement water and sewer usage
billing in accordance with subsection 6 of this section.

HCS HB 2105 3
10. An owner's or operator's third-party water and sewer usage billing provider
may charge and collect from lessees a fee for late payment of charges billed to lessees in
accordance with subsection 7 of this section. The late charge shall be deemed as rent.
11. An owner or operator of premises or the owner's or operator's third-party
water and sewer usage billing provider's furnishing to lessees of water and sewer
services and the charging of lessees separately for their use of water and sewer services
in accordance with this section shall not constitute the sale or resale of water and sewer
services that may be subject to the jurisdiction of the Missouri public service
commission.
✔